Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1512
Department; powers; Water Sustainability
Fund; use.

In
order to develop Nebraska's water resources, the department, using the process
provided for in subsection (4) of section 2-1509, and with the approval of
the commission, may acquire interests in water and related land resources
projects in the name of the state utilizing the Water Sustainability Fund.
Such use of the fund shall be made when the public benefits obtained from
the projects or a part thereof are statewide in nature and when associated
costs are determined to be more appropriately financed by other than a local
organization. Such use of the fund may be made upon the determination by the
department and the commission that such acquisition is appropriate under sections
2-1506 to 2-1513. The department, with the approval of the commission, may
also acquire interests in water resource projects in the name of the state
to meet future demands for usable water. Such water resource projects may
include, but not be limited to, the construction of dams and reservoirs to
provide surplus water storage capacity for municipal and industrial water
demands and for other projects to assure an adequate quantity of usable water.
In furtherance of these goals, the department may contract with the federal
government or any of its agencies or departments for the inclusion of additional
water supply storage space behind existing or proposed structures.

Laws 2014, LB1098, § 9.